Florida, session 2026, SB1236.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 69 70 Section 1.âSection 447.18, Florida Statutes, is created and 71 incorporated into part I of chapter 447, Florida Statutes, to 72 read: 73 447.18âEmployers receiving state-awarded economic 74 development incentives; prohibited acts related to labor 75 organizations.â 76 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 77 (a)ââContractâ means an agreement: 78 1.âBetween an employer and the state; or 79 2.âBetween an employer and a labor organization. 80 (b)ââEconomic development incentiveâ means a state economic 81 development incentive program or an economic development grant 82 authorized by any state agency for the purpose of economic 83 development, the purpose of which is to attract or retain an 84 employerâs physical presence in this state. 85 (c)ââEmployeeâ means an individual who performs services 86 for an employer for wages that are subject to withholding 87 requirements under 26 U.S.C. s. 3402. 88 (d)ââEmployerâ means a business entity that voluntarily 89 pursues economic development incentives authorized under this 90 section or enters into an agreement with a state agency for the 91 purpose of receiving economic development incentives. 92 (e)ââLabor organizationâ has the same meaning as in s. 93 447.02(1). 94 (f)ââNeutrality agreementâ means an agreement signed by an 95 employer and a union in which the employer agrees to conditions 96 including, but not limited to, committing not to speak to 97 employees about union issues. 98 (g)ââPersonal contact informationâ means an employeeâs home 99 address, personal phone number, or personal e-mail address. 100 (h)ââSecret ballot electionâ means a process conducted by 101 the National Labor Relations Board in which an employee casts a 102 secret ballot for or against labor organization representation. 103 (i)ââSubcontractorâ has the same meaning as in s. 448.095. 104 (2)(a)âTo be eligible for an economic development 105 incentive, an employer must sign an agreement with the state 106 agency awarding the economic development incentive stating that 107 it will not do any of the following: 108 1.âGrant union recognition rights for employees solely on 109 the basis of signed union authorization cards if the selection 110 of a bargaining representative may instead be conducted through 111 a secret ballot election conducted by the National Labor 112 Relations Board. 113 2.âVoluntarily disclose an employeeâs personal contact 114 information to a labor organization, or third party acting on 115 behalf of a labor organization, without the employeeâs written 116 consent, unless otherwise required by state or federal law. 117 3.âSign a neutrality agreement with a labor organization. 118 4.âRequire a subcontractor performing work for or providing 119 services to the employer to engage in activities prohibited in 120 this paragraph. 121 (b)âThe prohibitions in paragraph (a) apply to any work or 122 service provided to the employer on the project for which the 123 economic development incentive is awarded. 124 (3)(a)âA person or an entity may report, based upon a 125 reasonable belief, a violation of paragraph (2)(a) to the 126 Attorney General, provided that such report is made during the 127 term of the separate agreement entered into by and between the 128 government agency awarding the economic development incentive 129 and the employer in subsection (5). 130 (b)âUpon receiving the report, the Attorney General shall 131 determine whether a violation has occurred. The Attorney General 132 shall request from the employer a copy of the written agreement 133 signed pursuant to paragraph (2)(a). If the employer refuses to 134 provide the Attorney General with the written agreement, the 135 employer is in violation of the agreement entered into between 136 the employer and the state agency that awarded the economic 137 development incentive. The Attorney General must deliver in 138 writing his or her findings to the employer alleged to be in 139 violation within 60 days. If the Attorney General finds that an 140 employer has violated the written agreement signed pursuant to 141 paragraph (2)(a), he or she shall initiate proceedings to 142 recover funds awarded to the employer. The Attorney Generalâs 143 findings are final. 144 (4)âNotwithstanding any other law to the contrary, before 145 contracting to award an economic development incentive, the 146 state agency must execute a separate written agreement with the 147 recipient of the economic development incentive which reserves 148 the right of the state agency to recover the amount of money, 149 grants, funds, or other incentives disbursed by the state agency 150 if the recipient benefiting from such money, grants, funds, or 151 other incentives fails to comply with this section. This 152 agreement is effective for either: 153 (a)âThe duration of the project, to be determined by the 154 state agency, for an economic development incentive award of 155 less than $5 million; or 156 (b)âNo longer than 20 years, for an economic development 157 incentive award of $5 million or more. 158 (5)âThis section applies to any agreement entered into, 159 renewed, or modified after July 1, 2026. As used in this 160 subsection, the term âagreementâ includes a memorandum of 161 understanding mutually accepted by the state agency awarding 162 economic development incentives and an employer before July 1, 163 2026, including a legally binding agreement subsequent and 164 subject to the memorandum of understanding. 165 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.